Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB94.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 190.046 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Qualifying repair" means a repair to a vehicle included within the
manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, factory branch, or distributor branch
original new motor vehicle warranty, except when the vehicle on which the
repair was performed exceeds the chronological or mileage limit of the
warranty, and the repair does not otherwise constitute warranty work and
does not include any of the work described in subsection (4)(b) of this
section;
(b) "Qualifying repair order" means a repair order that encompasses, in whole
or in part, a qualifying repair;
(c) "Repair order" means an invoice paid by a retail customer and closed at the
time of submission, which encompasses one (1) or more repairs to or other
work on a vehicle, and reflects, in the case of a:
1. Parts markup submission, the dealer's cost and sale price for each
part; and
2. Labor rate submission, the amount charged for labor, and the number
of hours that generated those charges;
(d) "Warranty" means and includes a new motor vehicle warranty, a recall, or
a certified pre-owned warranty of a manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler,
factory branch, or distributor branch to repair or replace a vehicle or part,
including manufacturers of all-terrain vehicles as defined in KRS 189.010;
and
(e) "Warranty work":
1. Means work, including necessary diagnostic labor, performed by a
Page 1 of 15
SB009410.100 - 410 - XXXX 3/6/2026 10:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 94/GA
dealer in order to fulfill the obligations of a manufacturer, distributor,
wholesaler, factory branch, or distributor branch:
a. Warranty;
b. Recall; or
c. Service contract that the manufacturer required in writing the
dealer to provide the customer at the time of sale at no additional
cost; and
2. Includes work a dealer arranges to be performed if the work is
authorized by a manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, factory branch,
or distributor branch in order to fulfill the warranty or recall
obligations of the manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, factory
branch, or distributor branch warranty.
(2) Notwithstanding the terms of any franchise agreement, each motor vehicle
manufacturer or distributor[,] doing business within this Commonwealth[,] shall,
except for claims involving negligence by the dealer, including its employees and
subcontractors, assume all responsibility for and shall defend, indemnify, and hold
harmless its motor vehicle dealers against any loss, damages, and expenses,
including legal costs, arising out of:
(a) Complaints, claims, warranty repairs, recall repairs or modifications, or
factory authorized or directed repairs;
(b) [, or ]Lawsuits resulting from warranty defects, which shall include structural
or production defects; or
(c) Defects in the assembly[;] or design of motor vehicles, parts, accessories,[;] or
other functions beyond the control of the dealer, including without limitation,
the selection of parts or components for the vehicle. Each manufacturer or
distributor shall pay[ reasonable] compensation to any authorized dealer who
performs work to repair defects, or to repair any damage to the manufacturer's
Page 2 of 15
SB009410.100 - 410 - XXXX 3/6/2026 10:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 94/GA
or distributor's product sustained while the product is in transit to the dealer,
when the carrier or the means of transportation is designated by the
manufacturer or distributor.
(3) (a) 1. Each manufacturer or distributor shall provide to its dealers with each
model year a schedule of time allowances for the performance of
warranty repair work and services, which shall include time allowances
for the diagnosis and performance of warranty work and service time[,
and shall be reasonable and adequate for the work to be performed].
2. A manufacturer or distributor shall not deny a written request
submitted by a franchised dealer for modification of a manufacturer
or distributor's uniform time allowance for a specific warranty repair,
or a request submitted by a franchised dealer for an additional time
allowance for either diagnostic or repair work on a specific vehicle
covered under warranty, unless:
a. The request fails to include all information and documentation
reasonably required by the manufacturer or distributor to assess
the merits of the franchised dealer's request;
b. Information submitted with the request fails to substantiate the
merits of the request which, if the request is for a modification of
a time allowance, must include a substantiation that the
manufacturer or distributor's time allowance is insufficient for a
qualified technician to complete the repair under ordinary
circumstances;
c. The manufacturer or distributor rebuts the time allowance
claimed by the dealer for a modification of the manufacturer or
distributor's uniform time allowance or request for additional
time allowance for diagnostic or repair work on a specific
Page 3 of 15
SB009410.100 - 410 - XXXX 3/6/2026 10:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 94/GA
vehicle;
d. For purposes of modification of a uniform time allowance, the
manufacturer or distributor provides an explanation for why a
dealer can complete the repair in the time allowed or establishes
a new time allowance and provides an explanation for the new
time allowance; or
e. For purposes of a request for additional time allowance for
diagnostic or repair work on a specific vehicle, the manufacturer
determines that the hours claimed were unnecessary, fraudulent,
for diagnostic or repair work that did not follow the
manufacturer or distributor's diagnostic and repair procedures,
or were worked to remedy a mistake by the dealer or its
employee.
3. A manufacturer or distributor may require requests to be submitted in
accordance with a uniform process, which may not be unduly
burdensome or time consuming.
4. A manufacturer or distributor shall respond to a franchised dealer's
accurate and complete request for additional time for diagnostic or
repair work on a specific warranty repair within forty-five (45) days or
the request shall be deemed approved. A manufacturer or distributor
shall respond to a franchised dealer's accurate, complete request to
modify a uniform time allowance within two hundred forty (240) days
or the request shall be deemed approved. The time periods in this
subparagraph shall be tolled if the manufacturer or distributor
demonstrates its ability to respond is delayed due to strike, shortage,
act of God, or other cause over which the manufacturer or distributor
has no control.
Page 4 of 15
SB009410.100 - 410 - XXXX 3/6/2026 10:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 94/GA
(b) A manufacturer shall not require a term, policy, or procedure different from
those described in this section for any motor vehicle dealer to obtain
compensation under this section, or pay a motor vehicle dealer or
franchised dealer of an all-terrain vehicle, as defined in KRS 189.010, less
than the rates due pursuant to this section.
(c) 1. Manufacturers shall pay motor vehicle dealers and franchised dealers
of all-terrain vehicles the same retail labor rate that the dealer receives
for customer-pay repairs, including diagnostic time for all warranty
repairs as well as service, labor, and parts.
2. A dealer's retail labor rate shall be established by submission by the
dealer of their choice of one hundred (100) consecutive qualifying
repair orders or all qualifying repair orders in a ninety (90) day
period, whichever is less. If a manufacturer or distributor believes the
dealer's retail labor rate, based on the submitted documentation, is
misleading, inaccurate, or fraudulent, the manufacturer or distributor
may rebut the dealer's submitted rate or initiate legal proceedings.
3. If a qualified technician is required to communicate with a technical
assistance center, an engineering department, or some external
manufacturer source in order to provide a warranty repair on an issue
not covered by a manufacturer's service manual or bulletin, the
manufacturer shall pay for the time from the start of the
communication, including time on hold, until the communication is
complete, provided the communication was made in good faith.
(d) A motor vehicle dealer or franchised dealer of all-terrain vehicles may
submit a request to the manufacturer for a warranty labor rate increase or
parts markup increase no more than once in any twelve (12) month period.
The request shall be made by the dealer in writing and based on one
Page 5 of 15
SB009410.100 - 410 - XXXX 3/6/2026 10:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 94/GA
hundred (100) consecutive qualifying repair orders or all qualifying repair
orders over a ninety (90) day period, whichever is less.
(e) A dealer seeking to establish or modify the warranty labor rate or parts
markup shall submit to the manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, factory
branch, or distributor branch a single set of repair orders for the purpose of
calculating:
1. Both the labor rate and parts markup; or
2. Only the labor rate or parts markup, if the dealer has not requested to
establish or modify that rate within the previous twelve (12) months.
(f) 1. The submitted parts markup or labor rate shall be presumed accurate
and shall go into effect thirty (30) days after the manufacturer,
distributor, wholesaler, factory branch, or distributor branch approves
the submission. If the manufacturer or distributor does not approve or
rebut the declared rate within thirty (30) days of receipt, then the rate
shall be deemed approved on the thirty-first day following receipt.
2. The manufacturer or distributor shall propose an adjustment of the
average percentage parts markup or labor rate based on that rebuttal
no later than thirty (30) days after receipt of the submission.
3. If the dealer does not agree with the proposed average percentage
markup, the dealer may file a protest with the commission not later
than sixty (60) days after receipt of that proposal by the manufacturer
or distributor.
4. If a protest is filed, the commission shall inform the manufacturer or
distributor that a timely protest has been filed and that a hearing will
be held on the protest. In any hearing held pursuant to this paragraph,
the manufacturer or distributor shall have the burden of proving that
the rate declared by the dealer was unfair and unreasonable and that
Page 6 of 15
SB009410.100 - 410 - XXXX 3/6/2026 10:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 94/GA
the proposed adjustment of the average percentage markup or labor
rate is fair and reasonable pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.
(g) Warranty repairs and recall repairs, including voluntary stop-sell repairs
required by the manufacturers, shall not be excluded from the requirements
of this subsection. If a manufacturer issues a recall, the dealer shall be
compensated for labor time as set forth in this subsection.
(h) If a manufacturer or distributor determines from any set of repair orders
submitted under this section that the retail labor rate or parts markup
percentage is substantially higher or lower than the rate currently on record
with the manufacturer or distributor for labor or parts, the manufacturer or
distributor may request additional documentation for a period of either sixty
(60) days prior to or sixty (60) days subsequent to the time period for which
the repair orders were submitted for purposes of an alteration or to rebut
the dealer's proposed rate.
(i) 1. A manufacturer or distributor may request up to one hundred (100)
additional consecutive repair orders that exclude repairs listed in
subsection (4)(b) of this section and that are different from those
provided under paragraphs (c)2. and (d) of this subsection from a
dealer to determine if the dealer's parts markup rate, labor rate, or
both are materially different than the rates the dealer has declared
with the manufacturer or distributor.
2. The manufacturer or distributor may adjust the subsequent rates paid
by the manufacturer or distributor to the dealer if the manufacturer or
distributor determines that the dealer's rates charged to customers for
nonwarranty work are less than the rates currently being paid by the
manufacturer or distributor to the dealer for warranty work. The
manufacturer or distributor shall have thirty (30) days from receiving
Page 7 of 15
SB009410.100 - 410 - XXXX 3/6/2026 10:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 94/GA
all requested additional repair orders to rebut the new vehicle dealer's
retail labor rate, retail parts rate, or both.
3. The additional repair orders specified in this paragraph shall be from
a ninety (90) day period selected by the manufacturer or distributor
within the most recent previous twelve (12) month period, and the
repair orders shall be selected by the dealer. A manufacturer or
distributor may not request repair orders under this paragraph within
twelve (12) months of any prior request under this paragraph.
(4)[(2)] (a) A motor vehicle dealer or franchised dealer of all-terrain vehicles that
is entitled to compensation for warranty work shall be compensated for all
aggregated aspects of the repair[In the determination of what constitutes
"reasonable compensation" under this section, the principal factor to be
considered shall be the amount of money that the dealer is charging its other
customers for the same type service or repair work. Other factors may be
considered, including:
1. The compensation being paid by other manufacturers or distributors to
their dealers for work; and
2. The prevailing amount of money being paid or charged by the dealers in
the city or community in which the authorized dealer is doing business.
(b) "Reasonable compensation" shall include:
1. Diagnosing the defect as needed;
2. Repair service;
3. Labor;
4. Parts; and
5. Administrative and clerical costs].
(b) In calculating the labor rate or parts markup, the following shall not be
included:
Page 8 of 15
SB009410.100 - 410 - XXXX 3/6/2026 10:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 94/GA
1. Repairs subject to manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, factory
branch, or distributor branch discounts, such as special events, special
promotions, coupons, or service campaigns;
2. Parts sold at wholesale;
3. Repairs of vehicles owned by the dealer or an employee of the dealer;
4. Routine maintenance, including but not limited to the replacement of
fluids, filters, batteries, bulbs, belts, nuts, bolts, or fasteners;
5. Installations of accessories;
6. Replacement of or work on tires or wheels, including alignments
unless required during the course of a qualifying repair, wheel or tire
rotations, or replacement of brake drums, rotors, shoes, or pads;
7. Vehicle reconditioning;
8. Safety or emission inspections required by law;
9. Repairs for which volume discounts have been negotiated with
government agencies or insurers;
10. Parts that do not have individual part numbers;
11. Manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, factory branch, or distributor
branch approved and reimbursed goodwill repairs or reimbursements;
12. Windshield replacements, window etchings, window tints, protective
films, or other masking products;
13. Vehicle body damage repairs;
14. Repairs of nonline make vehicles or repairs with aftermarket parts
when calculating the retail parts rate but not the retail labor rate;
15. Repairs on aftermarket parts; or
16. Parts sold or repairs performed or paid for by insurance carriers.
(c)[ Except as provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection, the compensation of a
dealer shall not be less than:
Page 9 of 15
SB009410.100 - 410 - XXXX 3/6/2026 10:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 94/GA
1. The amount charged by the dealer for like services and parts, which
minimum compensation for parts shall be dealer cost plus thirty percent
(30%) gross profit, to retail customers for nonwarranty service and
repairs; or
2. The amounts indicated for work on the schedule of warranty
compensation required to be filed by the manufacturer with the
commission as a part of the manufacturer's license application by KRS
190.030.
(d)] The compensation of a dealer for vehicles with a classification of seven (7) or
higher as established in 49 C.F.R. sec. 565.15 by a manufacturer, component
manufacturer, or distributor shall not be less than the greater of:
1. The amount charged by the dealer to the retail customers of the dealer
for nonwarranty work of like kind; or
2. The dealer acquisition costs of parts or service.
(d)[(e)] Payments shall not be reduced due to preestablished market norms or
market averages. Manufacturers shall not establish restrictions or
limitations of customer repair frequency due to failure rate indices or
national failure averages.
(e) 1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, if a
manufacturer furnishes parts or components to a motor vehicle dealer
at no cost to use in performing repairs subject to a recall or warranty
repair, the manufacturer shall compensate the motor vehicle dealer
for the parts or components in an amount equivalent to the motor
vehicle dealer's retail average percentage markup on the parts or
component as if the parts or components had been sold to the motor
vehicle dealer by the manufacturer.
2. For work involving a complete engine, transmission, or electric or
Page 10 of 15
SB009410.100 - 410 - XXXX 3/6/2026 10:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 94/GA
hybrid vehicle propulsion battery, the manufacturer or distributor
shall provide the dealer with compensation totaling not less than
twenty percent (20%) of the price of the component in the
manufacturer or distributor's parts catalog, not to exceed one
thousand dollars ($1,000) per component, regardless of whether the
part was provided by the manufacturer at no cost, at a discount, or
purchased by the dealer from the manufacturer at full cost.[A
manufacturer or distributor shall not require unreasonable proof to
establish "reasonable compensation."]
(5)[(3)] (a) A manufacturer or distributor shall not require a dealer to submit a claim
authorized under this section sooner than thirty (30) days after the dealer
completes the preparation, delivery, or warranty service authorizing the claim
for preparation, delivery, or warranty service.
(b) All claims made by a dealer under this section shall be paid within thirty (30)
days after their approval.
(c) All claims shall be either approved or disapproved by the manufacturer or
distributor within thirty (30) days after their receipt on a completed form
supplied or approved by the manufacturer or distributor.
(d) Any claims not specifically disapproved in writing within thirty (30) days
after the receipt of the form shall be considered to be approved and payment
shall be made within thirty (30) days thereafter.
(e) A dealer shall not be required to maintain defective parts for more than thirty
(30) days after payment of a claim.
(f) Any dispute between the dealer and the manufacturer or distributor shall be
subject to the provisions of KRS 190.057.
(6) If a manufacturer imposes a recall or a stop-sale order on any new vehicle in a
dealer's inventory that prevents the sale of the vehicle, the manufacturer shall
Page 11 of 15
SB009410.100 - 410 - XXXX 3/6/2026 10:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 94/GA
compensate the dealer in accordance with 49 U.S.C. sec. 30116.
(7) (a) If parts or a remedy are not reasonably available to perform a recall service
or repair on a used vehicle held for sale by a dealer authorized to sell and
service new vehicles of the same line make within thirty (30) days of the
manufacturer issuing the initial notice of recall, and the manufacturer has
issued a stop-sale or do-not-drive order on the vehicle, the manufacturer
shall compensate the dealer at a prorated rate of at least one percent (1%) of
the value of the vehicle each month beginning on the date that is thirty (30)
days after the date on which the stop-sale or do-not-drive order was
provided to the dealer until the earlier of either the date the:
1. Recall or remedy parts are made available; or
2. Dealer sells, trades, or otherwise disposes of the affected used motor
vehicle.
(b) The value of a used vehicle shall be the average trade-in value for used
vehicles as indicated in an independent third-party guide for the year, make,
and model of the recalled vehicle.
(c) This subsection shall only apply to:
1. Used vehicles subject to safety or emissions recalls pursuant to and
recalled in accordance with federal law and regulations and where a
stop-sale or do-not-drive order has been issued and repair parts or
remedy remain unavailable for thirty (30) days or longer; and
2. New motor vehicle dealers holding an affected used vehicle for sale:
a. In inventory at the time the stop-sale or do-not-drive order was
issued; or
b. Which was taken in the used vehicle inventory of the dealer as a
consumer trade-in incident to the purchase of a new vehicle
from the dealer after the stop-sale or do-not-drive order was
Page 12 of 15
SB009410.100 - 410 - XXXX 3/6/2026 10:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 94/GA
issued; and
c. That is a line make that the dealer is franchised to sell or on
which the dealer is authorized to perform recall repairs.
(d) A manufacturer or distributor may compensate its dealers under a national
recall compensation program, provided the compensation under the
program is:
1. Equal to or greater than that provided under paragraph (b) of this
subsection; or
2. Of an amount on which the manufacturer or distributor and the
dealer agree.
(e) A manufacturer or distributor may direct the manner and method in which
a dealer must demonstrate the inventory status of an affected used motor
vehicle to determine eligibility under paragraph (c) of this subsection,
provided that the manner and method may not be unduly burdensome and
may not require information that is unduly burdensome to provide.
(f) This subsection shall not require a manufacturer or distributor to provide
total compensation to a dealer which would exceed the total average trade-
in value of the affected used motor vehicle as originally determined under
paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(g) Any remedy provided to a dealer under this subsection shall be exclusive
and shall not be combined with any other state or federal recall
compensation remedy.
(8) (a) Subject to paragraph (b) of this subsection, a manufacturer shall not
establish an unduly burdensome process for:
1. The submission of a repair order; or
2. Proving payment for submitted repair orders.
(b) Requiring customer signatures or receipts shall not be considered unduly
Page 13 of 15
SB009410.100 - 410 - XXXX 3/6/2026 10:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 94/GA
burdensome under this subsection.
(9)[(4)] A manufacturer or distributor shall compensate the dealer for manufacturer-
sponsored or distributor-sponsored sales or service promotion events, including but
not limited to rebates, programs, or activities in accordance with established written
guidelines for such events, programs, or activities, which the manufacturer or
distributor shall provide to each dealer.
(10)[(5)] (a) A manufacturer or distributor shall not require a dealer to submit a claim
authorized under subsection (9)[(4)] of this section sooner than thirty (30)
days after the dealer becomes eligible to submit the claim.
(b) All claims made by a dealer pursuant to subsection (9)[(4)] of this section for
promotion events, including but not limited to rebates, programs, or activities,
shall be paid within thirty (30) days after their approval.
(c) All claims shall be either approved or disapproved by the manufacturer or
distributor within thirty (30) days after their receipt on a completed form
supplied or approved by the manufacturer or distributor.
(d) Any claim not specifically disapproved in writing within thirty (30) days after
the receipt of this form shall be considered to be approved and payment shall
be made within thirty (30) days.
(e) Any claim disapproved in writing within thirty (30) days of submission shall
state the reason for the disapproval and permit the motor vehicle dealer to
correct and resubmit the disapproved claim within thirty (30) days of receipt
of the disapproval.
(f) A timely made warranty claim shall not be deemed invalid solely because
unavailable parts cause additional use or mileage on the vehicle.
(11)[(6)] If a dealer submits any claim under this section to a manufacturer or
distributor that is incomplete, inaccurate, or lacking any information usually
required by the manufacturer or distributor, or if incomplete, inaccurate, or missing
Page 14 of 15
SB009410.100 - 410 - XXXX 3/6/2026 10:17 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS SB 94/GA
information is discovered during an audit, then the manufacturer or distributor shall
promptly notify the dealer, and the time limit to submit the claim shall be extended
for a reasonable length of time, not less than five (5) business days following notice
by the manufacturer or distributor to the dealer, for the dealer to provide the
complete, accurate, or lacking information to the manufacturer or distributor. A
dealer's failure to comply with the specific requirements of the manufacturer or
distributor for processing a claim may not constitute grounds for denial of the claim
or reduction of the amount of compensation paid to the dealer if the dealer presents
reasonable documentation or other evidence to substantiate the claim.
(12)[(7)] (a) A manufacturer or distributor may only audit warranty, recall, sales, or
incentive claims for a period of twelve (12) months following payment, or the
end of a program which does not exceed one (1) year in length, whichever is
later, subject to all of the provisions of this section.
(b) A manufacturer or distributor shall not require documentation for warranty,
recall, sales, or incentive claims more than twelve (12) months after the claim
was paid or the end of a program which does not exceed one (1) year in
length, whichever is later.
(c) Prior to requiring any charge-back, reimbursement, or credit against a future
transaction arising out of an audit, the manufacturer or distributor shall submit
written notice to the dealer along with a copy of its audit and the detailed
reason for each intended charge-back, reimbursement, or credit.
(d) Notwithstanding the limitations of this subsection, a manufacturer that
possesses evidence which would cause a person of ordinary caution,
prudence, and judgment to believe that a dealer submitted a claim that was
fraudulent, false, or misleading may audit the dealer for the claims during any
period in which an action for fraud or for the submission of false or
misleading claims may be commenced under applicable state law.
Page 15 of 15
SB009410.100 - 410 - XXXX 3/6/2026 10:17 AM GA